Georgia, session 2025_26, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 12 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to control of
hazardous conditions, preventable diseases, and metabolic disorders, is amended by revising
subsection (a) of Code Section 31-12-6, relating to a system for prevention of serious illness,
severe physical or developmental disability, and death resulting from inherited metabolic and
genetic disorders, and establishment of Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory
Committee, as follows:
"(a) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations creating a newborn screening
system, which shall include screening for Duchenne muscular dystrophy, for the prevention
of serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death caused by
S. B. 101
- 1 -

LC 60 0070
inherited metabolic and genetic disorders as identified by the department. The department
shall be authorized to consider recommendations from the Newborn Screening and
Genetics Advisory Committee established pursuant to subsection (i) of this Code section,
to include disorders which are added to the federal Recommended Uniform Screening
Panel and may be identified in the future to result in serious illness, severe physical or
developmental disability, and death if undiagnosed and untreated."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 101
- 2 -